en: Shower Columns
xx: Shower Columns
cs: Sprchové panely
da: Brusesøjler
de: Duschpaneele
es: Paneles de ducha
fr: Colonnes de douche
it: Pannelli doccia
ja: シャワーパネル
nl: Douchepanelen
no: Dusjsøyler
pl: Baterie prysznicowe
pt: Painéis para chuveiros
ru: Панели для душа
sv: Takduschmunstycken
tr: Duş Panelleri

en: Shower Doors & Enclosures
xx: Shower Doors & Enclosures
cs: Sprchové dveře
da: Brusedøre og -kabiner
de: Duschkabinen & -türen
es: Puertas de ducha
fr: Portes et parois de douche
it: Porte doccia
ja: シャワールーム用ドア
nl: Douchedeuren
no: Dusjdører og -kabinetter
pl: Drzwi i kabiny prysznicowe
pt: Portas para chuveiros
ru: Двери и перегородки для душа
sv: Duschdörrar och nischer
tr: Duş Kapıları ve Duşakabinler

en: Shower Heads
xx: Shower Heads
cs: Sprchové hlavice
da: Brusehoveder
de: Duschköpfe
es: Cabezales de ducha
fr: Pommes de douche
it: Soffioni doccia
ja: シャワーヘッド
nl: Douchekoppen
no: Dusjhoder
pl: Głowice prysznicowe
pt: Cabeças de chuveiro
ru: Насадки для душа
sv: Duschstrilar
tr: Duş Başlıkları

en: Shower Walls & Surrounds
xx: Shower Walls & Surrounds
cs: Sprchové stěny
da: Brusenicher og -kabiner
de: Duschwände
es: Paredes y mamparas de ducha
fr: Panneaux de douche
it: Pareti doccia
ja: シャワールーム用壁材・周辺設備
nl: Douchewanden en -muren
no: Dusjvegger og -skiller
pl: Ścianki prysznicowe
pt: Cabines de chuveiro
ru: Перегородки и стены для душа
sv: Duschväggar och omgivningar
tr: Duşakabin Duvar ve Çevirmeleri

en: Shower Water Filters
xx: Shower Water Filters
cs: Sprchové filtry
da: Vandfiltre til bruser
de: Wasserfilter für Duschen
es: Filtros de agua para ducha
fr: Filtres de douche
it: Filtri acqua doccia
ja: シャワー用浄水器
nl: Waterfilters voor douche
no: Vannfiltre for dusj
pl: Filtry do wody do prysznica
pt: Filtros de água para chuveiro
ru: Фильтры для душа
sv: Duschvattenfilter
tr: Duşakabin Su Arıtıcıları

en: Sink Accessories
xx: Sink Accessories
cs: Dřezy a umyvadla – příslušenství
da: Vask – tilbehør
de: Waschbecken- & Spülenzubehör
es: Accesorios de lavabo
fr: Accessoires pour éviers
it: Accessori lavandini
ja: シンク関連用品
nl: Gootsteenbenodigdheden
no: Tilbehør til vasker
pl: Akcesoria do umywalek
pt: Acessórios para pia
ru: Принадлежности для раковин
sv: Tvättställstillbehör
tr: Lavabo Aksesuarları

en: Sink Legs
xx: Sink Legs
cs: Dřezové nožičky
da: Ben til vask
de: Waschbeckenfüße
es: Pies de lavabo
fr: Pieds de lavabo
it: Gambe lavandini
ja: シンク用脚
nl: Ophangsysteem gootsteen
no: Bein til vasker
pl: Nogi do umywalek
pt: Suportes para pias de banheiro
ru: Ножки для раковин
sv: Ben till tvättställ
tr: Lavabo Ayakları

en: Toilet & Bidet Accessories
xx: Toilet & Bidet Accessories
cs: Záchody a bidety – příslušenství
da: Toilet og bidet – tilbehør
de: Toiletten- und Bidetzubehör
es: Accesorios de baño y bidé
fr: Accessoires pour bidets et toilettes
it: Accessori WC e bidet
ja: トイレ・ビデ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor toilet en bidet
no: Toalett- og bidet-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do toalet i bidetów
pt: Acessórios para vasos sanitários e bidês
ru: Принадлежности для унитазов и биде
sv: Tillbehör till toaletter och bidéer
tr: Tuvalet ve Bide Aksesuarları

en: Ballcocks & Flappers
xx: Ballcocks & Flappers
cs: Splachovadla
da: Svømmerventiler og slagler
de: Kugelhähne & Verschlüsse
es: Válvulas de flotador y tapones
fr: Robinets à flotteur et clapets à battant
it: Galleggianti/flapper
ja: トイレタンク部品
nl: Kogelkleppen en vlotters
no: Kuleventiler og tilbakeslagsventiler
pl: Spłuczki toaletowe i korki do spłuczek
pt: Válvulas automáticas para vasos sanitários
ru: Шаровые краны и затворы
sv: Flottörventiler och backventiler
tr: Şamandıralar ve Kanatlı Supaplar

en: Bidet Faucets & Sprayers
xx: Bidet Faucets & Sprayers
cs: Bidetové baterie a sprchy
da: Vandhaner til bidet og bidetbrusere
de: Bidet-Hähne & -Sprüher
es: Grifos y pulverizadores para bidés
fr: Robinets et douchettes pour bidets
it: Doccette igieniche e rubinetti per bidet
ja: ビデ用ノズル・スプレー
nl: Bidetkranen en -sproeiers
no: Bidetkraner og -dusjer
pl: Kurki i dysze do bidetów
pt: Torneiras e chuveirinhos de bidê
ru: Краны и распылители для биде
sv: Bidékranar och -duschar
tr: Taharet Muslukları ve Püskürtücüler

en: Toilet & Bidet Seats
xx: Toilet & Bidet Seats
cs: WC sedátka
da: Toilet- og bidetsæder
de: Toilettensitze
es: Asientos deç inodoros y bidés
fr: Sièges de toilettes et de bidets
it: Tavolette WC e bidet
ja: 便座
nl: Wc-brillen en bidetzittingen
no: Toalett- og bidetseter
pl: Deski sedesowe i bidetowe
pt: Assentos de vaso sanitário e bidê
ru: Сиденья для унитазов и биде
sv: Toalett- och bidésitsar
tr: Klozet ve Bide Oturakları

en: Toilet Seat Covers
xx: Toilet Seat Covers
cs: Jednorázová WC sedátka
da: Toiletsædecovers
de: WC-Papiersitze
es: Fundas para asientos de inodoros
fr: Couvre-sièges de toilettes
it: Copriwater
ja: 便座カバー
nl: Toiletbrildekjes
no: Trekk til toalettseter
pl: Nakładki na deski sedesowe
pt: Capas para assentos de vaso sanitário
ru: Покрытия для сидений для унитазов
sv: Skydd för toalettsitsar
tr: Klozet Kağıtları

en: Toilet Seat Lid Covers
xx: Toilet Seat Lid Covers
cs: Potahy na WC sedátka
da: Covers til toiletbrætter
de: Toilettendeckel
es: Fundas para tapas de inodoros
fr: Couvercles de toilettes
it: Rivestimenti per coperchi di water
ja: トイレフタカバー
nl: Toiletdekselhoezen
no: Trekk til toalettlokk
pl: Nakładki na pokrywy desek sedesowych
pt: Capas para tampa de vaso sanitário
ru: Покрытия для крышки унитаза
sv: Lock för toalettsitsar
tr: Klozet Kapağı Örtüleri

en: Toilet Tank Covers
xx: Toilet Tank Covers
cs: Kryty WC nádržek
da: Cisternelåg
de: Spülkastenabdeckungen
es: Cubiertas para cisterna del inodoro
fr: Couvercles de réservoirs de toilettes
it: Coperchi di vaschette esterne per WC
ja: トイレタンクカバー
nl: Wc-stortbakdeksels
no: Toalettanklokk
pl: Nakładki na spłuczki
pt: Capas para caixa acoplada
ru: Крышки для смывных бачков
sv: Cisternlock
tr: Sifon Kapakları

en: Toilet Tank Levers
xx: Toilet Tank Levers
cs: Páčky ke splachovačům
da: Skyllehåndtag til cisterne
de: WC-Spülkastengriffe
es: Palancas para cisterna del inodoro
fr: Poignées de WC
it: Leve per vaschette di WC
ja: トイレタンクレバー
nl: Stortbakhendel
no: Toaletthåndtak
pl: Dźwignie do spłuczek
pt: Alavancas de descarga para vaso sanitário
ru: Рычаги сливных бачков
sv: Spolhandtag
tr: Sifon Kolları

en: Toilet Tanks
xx: Toilet Tanks
cs: WC nádržky
da: Cisterner
de: Spülkästen
es: Cisternas del inodoro
fr: Réservoirs de toilette
it: Vaschette per WC
ja: トイレタンク
nl: Toiletstortbakken
no: Toalettanker
pl: Spłuczki
pt: Descargas de vaso sanitário
ru: Смывные бачки
sv: Toalettcisterner
tr: Sifonlar

en: Toilet Trim
xx: Toilet Trim
cs: Záchodové doplňky
da: Toiletreservedele
de: Toilettenverkleidung
es: Accesorios de baño
fr: Éléments internes aux toilettes
it: Guarnizione WC
ja: トイレトリム
nl: Toiletversiering
no: Toalettbeslag
pl: Uszczelnienia do muszli
pt: Acessórios para vasos sanitários
ru: Принадлежности для унитазов
sv: Toalettvård
tr: Tuvalet Ayar Parçaları

en: Plumbing Fixtures
xx: Plumbing Fixtures
cs: Instalatérské armatury
da: Sanitetsinstallationer
de: Sanitärkeramik & Armaturen
es: Piezas para fontanería
fr: Équipements sanitaires
it: Articoli idraulici
ja: 排水・配管設備
nl: Sanitair
no: Armaturer
pl: Armatury
pt: Instalações de encanamento
ru: Водопроводная арматура
sv: Sanitära produkter
tr: Sıhhi Tesisat Armatürleri

en: Bathroom Suites
xx: Bathroom Suites
cs: Koupelnové sestavy
da: Badeværelsessæt
de: Badezimmerausstattungen
es: Piezas de baño
fr: Ensembles d'équipements pour salles de bains
it: Set di sanitari per bagno
ja: スイート バスルーム
nl: Badkamercombinaties
no: Baderomsserier
pl: Zestawy łazienkowe
pt: Conjuntos para banheiro
ru: Комплекты сантехники для ванной
sv: Sanitetsporslin
tr: Banyo Setleri

en: Bathtubs
xx: Bathtubs
cs: Vany
da: Badekar
de: Badewannen
es: Bañeras
fr: Baignoires
it: Vasche da bagno
ja: バスタブ
nl: Badkuipen
no: Badekar
pl: Wanny
pt: Banheiras
ru: Ванны
sv: Badkar
tr: Küvetler